Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 8. DEATH AND DISPOSITION OF THE BODY

SUBTITLE A. DEATH

CHAPTER 673. SUDDEN INFANT DEATH SYNDROME

Sec. 673.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of state health services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(3) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1504, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 673.002. AUTOPSY. (a) The death in this state of a child 12 months old or younger shall be immediately reported to the justice of the peace, medical examiner, or other proper official as prescribed by law if the child dies suddenly or is found dead and if the cause of death is unknown.

(b) The justice of the peace or medical examiner shall inform the child's legal guardian or parents that an autopsy shall be performed on the child. The state shall reimburse a county $500 for the cost of the autopsy if the primary cause of death of the child is sudden infant death syndrome. The executive commissioner shall adopt rules that:

(1) define sudden infant death syndrome; and

(2) describe the method for obtaining reimbursement for the cost of an autopsy.

(c) Reimbursement required by Subsection (b) is subject to the availability of funds.

(d) After the autopsy is completed, the child's parents or legal guardian shall be notified of the autopsy results.

(e) This section does not affect the duties of the justice of the peace or medical examiner prescribed by other laws.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1505, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 673.003. DESIGNATION OF SUDDEN INFANT DEATH SYNDROME AS PRIMARY CAUSE OF DEATH. Sudden infant death syndrome may be used as a primary cause of death on a death certificate required by Chapter 193.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.